California statutes. Elections Code
0049.04--the following census blocks:

2021, 2024, 2025, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017

0050.02--the following census blocks:

2013, 2014, 2015, 3023

0051.01--the following census blocks:

2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2013, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028

0052.01--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 2000, 2001, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016

0052.05--the following census blocks:

1015, 1016

0053.01--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1058, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 3029

0054.04--the following census blocks:

1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1021, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 3001, 3003, 3004, 3005, 6010, 6011, 6012

0086.02--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2042, 2043, 2044, 2045, 2046, 2047, 2048, 2049, 2050, 2051, 2052, 2053, 2054, 2055, 2056, 2057, 2058, 2059, 2060, 2061, 2062, 2063, 2064, 2065, 2066

0092.01--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024,
 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 2000, 2002, 2003, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038

0099.00--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1058, 1059, 1060, 1061, 1062, 1063, 1064, 1065, 1066, 1067, 1068, 2003, 2004, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 3000, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3026, 3027, 3028, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009,
 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4016, 4017, 4018, 4019, 4020, 4021, 4022, 4023, 4024, 4025, 4026, 4027, 4028, 4029, 4030, 4031, 4032, 4033, 4034, 4035, 4036, 4037, 4038, 4039, 4040, 4041, 4042, 4043, 4044, 4045, 4046, 4047, 4048, 4049, 4050, 4051, 4052, 4053, 4054, 4055, 4056, 4057, 4058, 4059, 4060, 4061, 4062, 4063, 4064, 4065, 4066, 4067, 4068, 4069, 4070, 4071, 4072, 4073, 4074, 4075, 4076, 4077, 4078, 4079, 4080, 4081, 4082, 4083, 4084

SAN JOAQUIN

Whole Tracts in San Joaquin County

0041.05, 0042.02, 0042.03, 0042.04, 0045.01, 0047.01, 0047.03

Partial Tracts in San Joaquin County

0040.01--the following census blocks:

1006, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020,
 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2042

0041.06--the following census blocks:

2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2017, 2018

0042.05--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011

0043.02--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016,
 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3008, 3009, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4019, 4020, 4021

0043.09--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2009, 2012

0043.10--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011

0044.03--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012

0044.04--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1029, 1038, 1039, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3006, 3007

0045.02--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 2008, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2024, 2025, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3007, 3008, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3021, 3022, 3023,
 3024

0046.00--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2042, 2043, 2044, 2045, 2046, 2047, 2048, 2049, 2050, 2051, 2052, 2053, 2054, 2055, 2056, 2057, 2058, 2059, 2060, 2061, 2062, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 3029, 3030, 3031, 3032, 3033, 3034, 3035,
 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4018, 4019, 4020, 4021, 4022, 4029, 4030, 5000, 5001, 5002, 5003, 5004, 5005, 5006, 5007, 5008, 5009, 5010, 5011, 5012, 5013

0047.04--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1027, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 3000, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3008, 3020, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 3029, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4019

0048.00--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1058, 1059, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4016, 4017, 4018, 4019, 4020, 4021, 4022, 4023, 4024, 4025, 4026, 4027, 4028, 4029, 4030, 4031, 4032, 4033, 4034, 4036, 4037, 4039, 4040, 4041, 4042, 4043, 4044, 4045,
 4047, 4048, 4049, 4050, 4051, 4052, 4061, 4062, 4064

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 96, Sec. 1.   (AB 604)   Effective August 21, 2025.   Conditionally repealed pursuant to Section 21455.)
-------------------------------------------

21408.

Congressional District 08 consists of the following:

Whole Counties in Congressional District 08

SOLANO

Partial Counties in Congressional District 08

CONTRA COSTA

Whole Tracts in Contra Costa County

3580.00, 3591.02, 3591.03, 3591.04, 3591.05, 3592.02, 3592.03, 3592.04, 3601.01, 3601.02, 3602.00, 3610.00, 3620.00, 3630.00, 3640.02, 3650.02, 3650.03, 3660.01, 3660.02, 3671.00, 3672.00, 3680.01, 3680.02, 3690.01, 3690.02, 3700.00, 3710.00, 3720.00, 3730.00, 3740.00, 3750.00, 3760.00, 3770.00, 3780.00, 3790.00, 3800.01, 3800.02, 3810.00, 3820.00, 3830.00, 3840.00, 3851.00,
 3852.00, 3860.00, 3870.00, 3880.00, 3891.00, 3892.00, 3901.00, 3902.00, 3910.00, 3920.00, 3922.01, 3922.02, 3923.00, 9800.00, 9900.00

Partial Tracts in Contra Costa County

3540.01--the following census blocks:

1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1018, 1033

3560.01--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019

3560.02--the following census blocks:

1015, 1016, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1027, 1028, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1098, 1099, 1100, 1101, 1106, 1107, 1108, 1109, 1110, 1111, 1112, 1113, 1114, 1115,
 1116, 1117, 1118, 1119, 1120, 1123, 1134, 1135, 1136, 1137, 1138, 1142, 1143, 1144, 1145, 1146, 1147, 1148, 1149, 1150, 1151, 1152, 1153, 1154, 1155, 1156, 1157, 1158, 1159, 1160, 1161, 1162, 1163, 1169, 1175, 1176, 1177, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022

3570.00--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1028, 1029, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037

SACRAMENTO

Whole Tracts in Sacramento County

0098.00

Partial Tracts in Sacramento County

0099.00--the following census
 blocks:

2000, 2001, 2002, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2023, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3029, 3030, 3031, 3032, 3033, 3034, 3035, 3036, 3037, 3038, 3039, 3040

SAN JOAQUIN

Whole Tracts in San Joaquin County

0041.04, 0042.06, 0043.05

Partial Tracts in San Joaquin County

0039.00--the following census blocks:

1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1127, 1128

0040.01--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018,
 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1058, 1059, 1060, 1061, 1062, 1063, 1064, 1065, 1066, 1067, 1068, 1069, 1070, 1071, 1072, 1073, 1074, 1075, 1076, 1077, 1078, 1079, 1080, 1081, 1082, 1083, 1084, 1085, 1086, 1087, 1088, 1089, 1090, 1091, 1092, 1093, 1094, 1095, 1096, 1100, 1101, 1102, 1103, 1104, 1105, 1106, 1107, 1109, 1110

0041.06--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1040, 1041, 1043, 1047, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032

0041.08--the following census blocks:

3008, 3009, 3021

0042.05--the following census blocks:

3003

0043.02--the following census blocks:

3006, 3007, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 4016, 4017, 4018, 4022, 4023, 4024, 4025, 4026, 4027, 4028, 4029, 4030, 4031

0043.07--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 2004, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3008, 3009, 3010

0043.08--the following census blocks:

3003

0043.09--the following census blocks:

2007, 2008, 2010, 2011, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024

0043.10--the following census blocks:

2012, 2013

YOLO

Whole Tracts in Yolo County

0106.07, 0106.08

Partial Tracts in Yolo County

0104.01--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048,
 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1058, 1059, 1060, 1061, 1062, 1063, 1064, 1065, 1066, 1067, 1068, 1069, 1070, 1071, 1072, 1073, 1074, 1075, 1076, 1077, 1078, 1079, 1080, 1081, 1082, 1083, 1084, 1085, 1086, 1087, 1088, 1089, 1090, 1091, 1092, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 4000, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4019, 4020, 4021, 4022, 4023, 4024, 4025, 4026, 4027, 4028, 4029, 4030, 4031, 4032, 4033, 4034, 4035, 4036

0104.02--the following census blocks:

1014, 1015, 1027, 1028, 1030, 1038, 1039

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 96, Sec. 1.   (AB 604)   Effective August 21, 2025.   Conditionally repealed pursuant to Section 21455.)
-------------------------------------------

21409.

Congressional District 09 consists of the following:

Partial Counties in Congressional District 09

CONTRA COSTA

Whole Tracts in Contra Costa County

3010.00, 3020.06, 3020.09, 3050.00, 3060.03, 3060.04, 3071.01, 3071.02, 3072.01, 3072.02, 3072.04, 3072.05, 3080.01, 3080.02, 3090.00, 3100.00, 3110.00, 3120.00, 3131.02, 3131.04, 3131.05, 3131.07, 3132.06, 3551.09, 3551.10, 3551.11, 3551.18, 3551.20

Partial Tracts in Contra Costa County

3020.05--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010,
 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3005, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007

3020.07--the following census blocks:

2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041

3020.11--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034

3020.13--the following census blocks:

1000, 2012, 2013

3032.06--the following census blocks:

2006, 2007, 2008

3032.07--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008

3060.02--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2041, 2043, 2044

3131.06--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2014, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2029, 2030, 2031

3132.03--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1008, 1009, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015

3132.04--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 2000, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2007, 2008, 2010, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003,
 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010

3132.05--the following census blocks:

1000, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008

3141.02--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1018, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021

3141.06--the following census blocks:

2000, 2001

3551.07--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005,
 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013

3551.19--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1020, 1024, 1025, 1026, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016

3552.01--the following census blocks:

1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011

3552.02--the
 following census blocks:

1001, 1016, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2022, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041

SAN JOAQUIN

Whole Tracts in San Joaquin County

0004.01, 0004.02, 0009.00, 0010.00, 0011.01, 0011.02, 0012.00, 0013.00, 0014.00, 0015.01, 0031.06, 0031.08, 0031.09, 0031.10, 0031.11, 0031.12, 0031.15, 0031.16, 0031.17, 0031.18, 0031.19, 0032.03, 0032.05, 0032.09, 0032.10, 0032.13, 0032.14, 0032.15, 0032.16, 0032.17, 0032.18, 0032.19, 0033.05, 0033.06, 0033.07, 0033.08, 0033.10, 0033.11, 0033.12, 0033.13, 0034.03, 0034.04, 0034.05, 0034.06, 0034.07, 0034.09, 0034.10, 0035.01, 0035.02, 0035.03, 0035.04, 0036.01, 0036.02, 0038.04, 0038.05, 0038.06, 0038.08, 0040.03, 0040.04, 0041.07, 0044.02, 0051.08, 0051.09, 0051.23, 0051.24, 0051.25, 0051.26, 0051.31,
 0051.32, 0051.33, 0051.34, 0051.35, 0051.36, 0051.37, 0051.38, 0051.39, 0051.40, 0051.41, 0052.08, 0052.11, 0052.12, 0052.13, 0052.15, 0052.16, 0052.17, 0052.18, 0052.19, 0052.20, 0052.21, 0052.22, 0052.23, 0052.24, 0052.25, 0053.03, 0053.07, 0053.08, 0053.09, 0053.10, 0053.11, 0053.12, 0054.03, 0054.05, 0054.06, 9800.00

Partial Tracts in San Joaquin County

0001.02--the following census blocks:

2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018

0003.00--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031

0005.00--the following census
 blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037

0008.02--the following census blocks:

1001, 1002, 1023, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1090, 1091, 1093, 1094, 1095

0008.03--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017

0015.02--the following census blocks:

1021, 1022, 1023, 2001, 2007

0025.03--the following census blocks:

1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017

0025.04--the following census blocks:

2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011

0027.01--the following census blocks:

1005, 1006, 1012, 1013

0027.02--the following census blocks:

1000

0037.00--the following census blocks:

2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024

0038.03--the following census blocks:

2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2025, 2027, 2034, 2036, 2037

0038.07--the following census blocks:

1002, 1003, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006

0039.00--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1058, 1059, 1060, 1061, 1062, 1063, 1064, 1065, 1066, 1067, 1068, 1069, 1070, 1071, 1072, 1073, 1074, 1075, 1076, 1077, 1078, 1079, 1080, 1081, 1082, 1083, 1084, 1085, 1086,
 1087, 1088, 1089, 1090, 1091, 1092, 1093, 1094, 1095, 1096, 1097, 1098, 1099, 1100, 1101, 1102, 1103, 1104, 1105, 1106, 1107, 1108, 1109, 1110, 1111, 1112, 1113, 1114, 1115, 1116, 1117, 1118, 1119, 1120, 1121, 1122, 1123, 1124, 1125, 1126, 1129, 1130, 1131, 1132, 1133, 1134, 1135, 1136, 1137, 1138, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2042, 2043, 2044, 2045, 2046, 2047, 2048, 2049, 2050, 2051, 2052, 2053, 2054, 2055, 2056, 2057, 2058, 2059, 2060, 2061, 2062, 2063, 2064, 2065

0040.01--the following census blocks:

1097, 1098, 1099, 1108

0041.06--the following census blocks:

1027, 1028, 1029, 1038, 1039, 1042, 1044, 1045, 1046,
 1048

0041.08--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 3029, 3030, 3031, 3032, 3033, 3034, 3035, 3036, 3037, 3038, 3039, 3040, 3041, 3042, 3043, 3044, 3045, 3046, 3047, 3048, 3049, 3050, 3051, 3052, 3053, 3054, 3055, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4016, 4017, 4018, 4019, 4020, 4021, 4022, 4023, 4024, 4025, 4026, 4027, 4028, 4029

0043.02--the following census blocks:

4004, 4005, 4032, 4033

0043.07--the following
 census blocks:

2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 3006, 3007

0043.08--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3004, 3005, 3006

0044.03--the following census blocks:

1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019

0044.04--the following census blocks:

1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045,
 1046, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3008, 3009

0045.02--the following census blocks:

2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2022, 2023, 3006, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3020

0046.00--the following census blocks:

4015, 4016, 4017, 4023, 4024, 4025, 4026, 4027, 4028

0047.04--the following census blocks:

3001, 3002, 3003, 3007, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3021, 3022, 3023, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4016, 4017, 4018, 4020, 4021, 4022, 4023, 4024, 4025, 4026, 4027, 4028, 4029, 4030, 4031, 4032, 4033, 4034, 4035, 4036, 4037, 4038, 4039, 4040, 4041, 4042

0048.00--the following census blocks:

3005, 4038

0050.01--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1058, 1059, 1060, 1061, 1062, 1063, 1064, 1065, 1066, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4016, 4017, 4018, 4019, 4020, 4021, 4022, 4023, 4024, 4025, 4026, 4027, 4028

0050.03--the following census blocks:

2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 3005, 3006, 3008, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4016, 4017, 4018, 4019, 4020, 4021, 4022, 4023, 4024, 4025, 4026, 4027, 4028, 4029, 4030, 4031, 4032, 4033, 4034, 4035, 4036, 4037, 4038, 4039, 4040, 4041

0050.04--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1020, 1021, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008,
 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4016, 4017, 4018, 4019, 4020, 4021, 4022, 4023, 4024, 4025, 4026, 4027

0051.06--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1029, 1031, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1058, 1059, 1060, 1061, 1062, 1063, 1064, 1069, 1070, 1071, 1072, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 3000, 3001, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4016, 4017, 4018, 4019, 4020, 4021, 4022, 4023, 4024, 4025, 4026, 4027, 4028, 4029, 4030, 4031, 4032, 4033, 4034, 4035, 4036, 4037, 4038, 4039, 4040,
 4041, 4042, 4043, 4044, 4045, 4046, 4047, 4048, 4049, 4050, 4051, 4052, 4053, 4054, 4055, 4056, 4057, 4058, 4059

0051.19--the following census blocks:

2000, 2001, 2002, 2012, 2013, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2049, 3007, 3008

0051.22--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 3000, 3002, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3033, 3034, 3035, 3036, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007

0052.14--the following census blocks:

1025, 1026, 1027, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041,
 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1058, 1059, 1060, 1061, 1062, 1063, 1064, 1065, 1066, 1067, 1068, 1069, 1070, 1071, 1135, 1136, 1137, 1145, 1146, 1147, 1148, 1149, 1150, 1151, 1152, 1153, 1154, 1155, 1156, 1157, 1164, 1165, 1167, 1168, 1169, 1170, 1171, 1172, 1173, 1174, 1175, 1176, 1177, 1178, 1179, 1180, 1181, 1182, 1183, 1184, 1185, 1186, 1187, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2042, 2043, 2044, 2045

0055.02--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038,
 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1058, 1059, 1060, 1061, 1062, 1063, 1066, 1067, 1068, 1069, 1095, 1139, 1140, 1141, 1142, 1144, 1145, 1146, 1147, 1148, 1149, 1150, 1151, 1152, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2010

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 96, Sec. 1.   (AB 604)   Effective August 21, 2025.   Conditionally repealed pursuant to Section 21455.)
-------------------------------------------

21410.

Congressional District 10 consists of the following:

Partial Counties in Congressional District 10

ALAMEDA

Whole Tracts in Alameda County

4301.01, 4301.02, 4302.00, 4303.00, 4304.00, 4305.00, 4306.00, 4307.00, 4308.00, 4337.00, 4338.01, 4339.00, 4340.00

Partial Tracts in Alameda County

4309.00--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1007, 1008, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 3000, 3001, 3002

4310.00--the following census blocks:

1000, 1002, 1003, 1004, 2003, 2004, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019

4328.00--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2013, 2014, 2015, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024

4331.02--the following census blocks:

1019

4332.00--the following census blocks:

3012, 3013, 3014, 3015

4338.02--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012,
 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024

4505.02--the following census blocks:

1008, 2009

CONTRA COSTA

Whole Tracts in Contra Costa County

3020.12, 3020.14, 3031.04, 3031.05, 3031.06, 3031.07, 3032.02, 3032.04, 3032.08, 3032.09, 3032.10, 3032.11, 3040.01, 3040.02, 3040.03, 3040.04, 3040.06, 3040.07, 3141.03, 3141.05, 3142.00, 3150.00, 3160.00, 3170.00, 3180.00, 3190.01, 3190.02, 3200.01, 3200.03, 3200.04, 3211.01, 3211.02, 3211.03, 3212.00, 3220.00, 3230.00, 3240.02, 3240.03, 3240.04, 3250.00, 3260.00, 3270.01, 3270.02, 3280.00, 3290.00, 3300.00, 3310.00, 3320.00, 3331.01, 3331.02, 3332.00, 3340.01, 3340.06, 3340.07, 3340.08, 3342.00, 3350.00, 3361.01, 3361.03, 3361.04, 3362.01,
 3362.02, 3371.00, 3372.01, 3372.02, 3373.00, 3381.01, 3381.02, 3382.01, 3382.03, 3382.04, 3383.01, 3383.02, 3390.01, 3390.03, 3390.04, 3400.01, 3400.03, 3400.04, 3410.00, 3430.01, 3430.02, 3430.03, 3451.01, 3451.02, 3451.03, 3451.05, 3451.11, 3451.12, 3451.13, 3451.14, 3451.15, 3451.16, 3451.17, 3451.18, 3452.03, 3452.04, 3452.05, 3452.06, 3461.01, 3461.02, 3462.03, 3462.04, 3462.05, 3462.06, 3470.00, 3480.00, 3490.00, 3500.00, 3511.01, 3511.03, 3511.04, 3511.05, 3512.00, 3521.01, 3521.02, 3522.01, 3522.02, 3530.01, 3530.02, 3540.02, 3551.12, 3551.13, 3551.15, 3551.21, 3551.22, 3551.23, 3551.24, 3551.25, 3551.26, 3553.02, 3553.06, 3553.07, 3553.08, 3553.09, 3553.10

Partial Tracts in Contra Costa County

3020.05--the following census blocks:

3004, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011

3020.07--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 2030, 2034, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014

3020.11--the following census blocks:

1025, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024

3020.13--the following census blocks:

1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021

3032.06--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005,
 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015

3032.07--the following census blocks:

2000, 2001, 2002, 2010, 2018, 2019

3060.02--the following census blocks:

2039, 2040, 2042, 2045

3131.06--the following census blocks:

2013, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2028

3132.03--the following census blocks:

1006, 1007, 1010, 2011

3132.04--the following census blocks:

2001, 2006, 2009, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014

3132.05--the following census blocks:

1001, 1002, 1003, 1004

3141.02--the following census blocks:

1017, 2005, 2006

3141.06--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015

3540.01--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032

3551.07--the following census blocks:

1008, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038,
 1039, 1040, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 3029, 3030, 3031

3551.19--the following census blocks:

1012, 1013, 1019, 1021, 1022, 1023

3552.01--the following census blocks:

1000, 1029, 3012, 3013

3552.02--the following census blocks:

1000, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 2020, 2021, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036

3560.01--the following census blocks:

3000, 3001, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025

3560.02--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1017, 1026, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1058, 1059, 1060, 1061, 1062, 1063, 1064, 1065, 1066, 1067, 1068, 1069, 1070, 1071, 1072, 1073, 1074, 1075, 1076, 1077, 1078, 1079, 1080, 1081, 1082, 1083, 1084, 1085, 1086, 1087, 1088, 1089, 1090, 1091, 1092, 1093, 1094, 1095, 1096, 1097, 1102, 1103, 1104, 1105, 1121, 1122, 1124, 1125, 1126, 1127, 1128, 1129, 1130, 1131, 1132, 1133, 1139, 1140, 1141, 1164, 1165, 1166, 1167, 1168, 1170, 1171, 1172, 1173, 1174

3570.00--the following census blocks:

1027, 1030, 1031, 1032, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 3000, 3001, 3002,
 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 96, Sec. 1.   (AB 604)   Effective August 21, 2025.   Conditionally repealed pursuant to Section 21455.)
-------------------------------------------

21411.

Congressional District 11 consists of the following:

Partial Counties in Congressional District 11

SAN FRANCISCO

Whole Tracts in San Francisco County

0101.01, 0101.02, 0102.01, 0102.02, 0103.00, 0104.01, 0104.02, 0105.00, 0106.00, 0107.01, 0107.02, 0108.00, 0109.01, 0109.02, 0110.01, 0110.02, 0111.01, 0111.02, 0112.00, 0113.00, 0117.00, 0118.00, 0119.01, 0119.02, 0120.01, 0120.02, 0121.00, 0122.02, 0122.03, 0122.04, 0123.01, 0123.02, 0124.03, 0124.04, 0124.05, 0124.06, 0125.02, 0125.03, 0125.04, 0126.01, 0126.02, 0127.00, 0128.01, 0128.02, 0129.01, 0129.02, 0130.01, 0130.02, 0131.01, 0131.02, 0132.00, 0133.00, 0134.01, 0134.02, 0135.00, 0151.00, 0152.01,
 0152.02, 0153.00, 0154.01, 0154.02, 0155.00, 0156.00, 0157.01, 0157.02, 0158.01, 0158.02, 0159.00, 0160.00, 0161.01, 0161.02, 0162.00, 0163.00, 0164.00, 0165.00, 0166.01, 0166.02, 0167.00, 0168.01, 0168.02, 0169.00, 0170.00, 0171.01, 0171.02, 0176.02, 0176.03, 0176.04, 0177.00, 0178.01, 0178.03, 0178.04, 0179.03, 0180.00, 0201.01, 0201.02, 0202.01, 0202.02, 0203.00, 0204.01, 0204.02, 0205.00, 0206.01, 0206.02, 0207.01, 0207.02, 0208.01, 0208.02, 0209.00, 0210.00, 0211.00, 0212.00, 0213.00, 0214.00, 0215.00, 0216.00, 0217.00, 0218.00, 0226.00, 0227.02, 0227.04, 0228.01, 0228.02, 0228.03, 0229.01, 0229.02, 0229.03, 0230.01, 0230.03, 0231.02, 0231.03, 0232.00, 0233.00, 0234.00, 0251.00, 0252.00, 0253.00, 0254.01, 0254.02, 0254.03, 0301.01, 0301.02, 0302.01, 0302.02, 0303.01, 0303.02, 0304.00, 0305.00, 0306.00, 0307.00, 0308.00, 0309.00, 0310.00, 0311.00, 0326.01, 0326.02, 0327.00, 0328.01, 0328.02, 0329.01, 0329.02, 0330.01, 0330.02, 0331.00, 0332.01, 0332.03, 0332.04, 0351.01, 0351.02, 0352.01, 0352.02,
 0353.00, 0354.00, 0401.00, 0402.00, 0426.01, 0426.02, 0427.00, 0428.00, 0451.00, 0452.01, 0452.02, 0476.00, 0477.01, 0477.02, 0478.01, 0478.02, 0479.02, 0479.03, 0479.04, 0601.00, 0604.00, 0607.01, 0607.02, 0607.03, 0611.01, 0611.02, 0612.00, 0614.01, 0614.02, 0615.01, 0615.02, 0615.03, 0615.04, 0615.05, 0615.06, 0615.07, 0615.08, 9802.00, 9803.00, 9804.01, 9806.00, 9809.00, 9901.00, 9902.00

Partial Tracts in San Francisco County

0255.02--the following census blocks:

1000, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3012, 3013, 3014

0257.01--the following census blocks:

2000

0312.01--the following census blocks:

1000, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005

0313.01--the following census blocks:

1000, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011
